Washington statutes.
RCW 35.51.900

Authority supplemental—1985 c 397.

The authority granted by sections 1 through 8 of this act is supplemental and in addition to the authority granted by Title 35 RCW and to any other authority granted to cities, towns, or municipal corporations to levy special assessments.

[ 1985 c 397 s 12.]